Maryland, session 2025, HB0001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–114.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TRANSIT SERVICE” AND “TRANSIT STATION” HAVE
THE MEANINGS STATED IN § 7–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE WHO IS:
(I) A STATE EMPLOYEE WHO WORKS AT A TRANSIT STATION,
AIRPORT, PORT FACILITY, OR HIGHWAY REST STOP;
– 1 –

Ch. 437 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) A STATE EMPLOYEE WHO PROVIDES TRANSIT SERVICE; OR
(III) EMPLOYED UNDER A CONTRACT WITH THE STATE TO
PROVIDE TRANSIT SERVICE; OR
(2) AN EMPLOYER OF AN EMPLOYEE DESCRIBED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IN CONSULTATION WITH STAKEHOLDERS, DEVELOP OR
IDENTIFY AND IMPLEMENT A TRAINING PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES A CURRICULUM
ON THE IDENTIFICATION AND REPORTING OF SUSPECTED HUMAN TRAFFICKING;
AND
(II) ADMINISTER THE TRAINING PROGRAM TO:
1. TO ALL EMPLOYEES AND CONTRACT EMPLOYEES OF
THE DEPARTMENT; AND
2. TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, DURING REGULAR
WORKING HOURS.
(2) THE TRAINING PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE A DEFINITION OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING; AND
(II) OFFER GUIDANCE TO EMPLOYEES AND CONTRACT
EMPLOYEES ON THE IDENTIFICATION OF POTENTIAL VICTIMS OF HUMAN
TRAFFICKING AND PROTOCOLS FOR REPORTING SUSPECTED HUMAN TRAFFICKING.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026 2027, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
EMPLOYER SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT ALL THE EMPLOYER’S
EMPLOYEES HAVE COMPLETED THE TRAINING PROGRAM.
(2) AN EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) PROVIDE A NEW EMPLOYEE WITH THE TRAINING REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF HIRE; AND
(II) TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, ADMINISTER THE TRAINING
PROGRAM DURING REGULAR WORKING HOURS.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 437
(E) EACH EMPLOYER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH A PROCEDURE FOR EMPLOYEES AND CONTRACT
EMPLOYEES TO REPORT SUSPECTED INCIDENTS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING TO THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL AGENCIES, INCLUDING THE DESIGNATED REGIONAL
NAVIGATOR; AND
(2) IMPLEMENT A HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION POLICY FOR
EMPLOYEES AND CONTRACT EMPLOYEES BY PROVIDING INFORMATION ON HOW TO:
(I) RECOGNIZE POTENTIAL VICTIMS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING;
(II) RESPOND TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A VICTIM
OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING; AND
(III) CONNECT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A VICTIM OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING WITH AVAILABLE RESOURCES.
(F) AN EMPLOYER, AN EMPLOYEE, OR A CONTRACT EMPLOYEE MAY NOT BE
HELD CIVILLY OR CRIMINALLY LIABLE FOR REPORTING OR RESPONDING IN GOOD
FAITH TO A SUSPECTED INCIDENT OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING.
(G) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE
FREQUENT PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENTS WITH SAFETY INFORMATION FOR
HUMAN TRAFFICKING VICTIMS TO BE MADE, IN BOTH ENGLISH AND SPANISH, AT
TRANSIT STATIONS, AIRPORTS, PORT FACILITIES, AND HIGHWAY REST STOPS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –